California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

19008.1.

“Used” means furniture or bedding that has been previously owned or used by another individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.2.

“Antique” means furniture having special value because of its age, especially a work of art or handicraft that is over 100 years old.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.5.

Any article of upholstered furniture or bedding is secondhand if it contains any secondhand material in whole or in part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.6.

Any article of upholstered furniture or bedding on sales floors in a private residence or room, which is not separated from living quarters, is secondhand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19009.

“Retailer” means a person who sells any article of upholstered furniture or bedding or filling materials to a consumer or user of the article as purchased.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19010.

“Bedding renovator” means a person who rebuilds, repairs, makes over, re-covers, restores, renovates or renews bedding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 401, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19010.1.

“Custom upholsterer” means a person who, either by himself or herself or through employees or agents, repairs, reupholsters, re-covers, restores, or renews upholstered furniture, or who makes to order and specification of the user any article of upholstered furniture, using either new materials or owner’s materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19010.5.

“Wholesaler” means a person who, on his or her own account, sells any article of upholstered furniture or bedding or filling materials to another for the purpose of resale, but shall not include an affiliate or a subsidiary where the ownership and name are identical, and that is the exclusive sales outlet of a manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.

“Manufacturer” means a person who, either by himself or herself or through employees or agents, makes any article of upholstered furniture or bedding in whole or in part, or who does the upholstery or covering of any unit thereof, using either new or secondhand material. “Manufacturer” does not, however, include a “custom upholsterer,” as defined in Section 19010.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.1.

“Importer” means a person who manufactures or wholesales, through employees or agents, any article of upholstered furniture, bedding, or filling material manufactured outside of the United States for the purpose of sale or resale in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19012.

“Supply dealer” means a person who manufactures, processes or sells any felt, batting, pads, woven or plastic fabrics, or loose material in bags or containers, concealed or not concealed, to be used or that could be used in articles of upholstered furniture or bedding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19012.5.

“Sanitizer” means a person who sanitizes articles of bedding or filling materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

19014.

“Branch” means any subordinate establishment situated apart from the parent house, maintaining a separate service to the trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19015.

“Slip seat” means the separate padded seat unit consisting of a plywood or similar base with its filling material and attached cover, which is used on chairs, benches, stools or similar articles, attached with screws or in any other manner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19016.

“Slip cover” means any casing or cover without filling material which is to be placed, on or over any completely manufactured article of upholstered furniture or bedding, and which is not permanently attached by tacking, sewing, or in any other manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19016.5.

A person engaged exclusively in the manufacture of slip covers shall not be required to have a license under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19017.

“Owner’s material” means any article or material belonging to a person for his or her own, or tenant’s use, that is sent to any manufacturer, bedding renovator, or custom upholsterer to be repaired or renovated, or used in repairing or renovating.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19018.

“Approved testing laboratory” means any testing facility which is determined by rule and regulation of the bureau to have adequate personnel, facilities, equipment, and expertise to carry out the testing required by this article. Testing of insulation material by the manufacturer in his or her own approved testing laboratory or in an approved independent testing laboratory under contract to the manufacturer may be utilized in the initial certification process and the continued maintenance of certifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19019.

“Insulation material” means any material or combination of materials applied or installed within or contiguous to a roof, wall, ceiling, or floor of a building or structure, or contiguous to the surface of any appliance or its intake or outtake mechanism, for the purpose of reducing heat transfer and thus energy requirements for heating and cooling or reducing adverse temperature fluctuations of the building, room, appliance, or structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 925, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

19020.

“R-value” means a measure of thermal resistance of material or composite materials. “R-value” is equal to the reciprocal of the conductance of a given material, orR-value =1conductance of the material
where
 the conductance of the material is: Btu (hour × square foot × Fahrenheit degree average temperature difference between two surfaces).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19021.

“Quality assurance program” means a system of procedures employed at the place of manufacture of insulation material designed to assure that insulation material produced at that place continues to meet the standards established by the bureau pursuant to this chapter. The program shall include, without limitation, regular periodic testing by an approved testing laboratory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

19022.

(a) An “insulation manufacturer” is any person who produces insulation materials or a combination of materials which, when properly applied or installed without any alteration, dilution, or modification so as to affect the thermal or physical properties, performance, or intended use as supplied by the manufacturer, retards the transfer of heat or cold. “Insulation manufacturer” also includes any person who produces finished products whose function is insulation, including, but not limited to, insulated roof and wall panels, insulation kits, pipe insulation, flexible insulated ducting, spray applied insulation systems, or other similar
 material.

(b) Anyone who alters, substitutes, or recompounds any insulation product or material shall be considered to be the manufacturer of that particular insulation product.

(c) Any applicator, contractor, or fabricator of insulation materials, who installs, applies, or uses insulation materials for their intended use, without changing the thermal or physical properties of the insulation material, shall not be considered an insulation manufacturer, provided that the manufacturer of the insulation material has been licensed in accordance with this chapter.

(d) As used in subdivision (b), “alteration,” “substitution,” or “recompounding” includes:

(1) The attachment of facings or vapor barriers, including, but not limited to, plastic, metal, felt,
 paper, or other similar materials.

(2) The compression, expansion, or reshaping of insulation materials.

(3) The addition of, or mixing with, adhesives.

(4) In the case of spray applied or foamed in place insulation, any addition to, substitution of, or deletion from, the chemical system provided by the insulation manufacturers.

(e) This chapter does not apply to the attaching of fiberglass insulation to metal duct work by a licensed contractor using industry-accepted adhesives and metal pins.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [19030. - 19034.5.]

19030.

Any reference in California law to the Bureau of Home Furnishings or to the Bureau of Home Furnishings and Thermal Insulation shall be deemed to refer to the Bureau of Household Goods and Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 29.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19031.

The duty of enforcing and administering this chapter, Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225), and Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 9800) of Division 3 is vested in the chief who is responsible to the director therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 17.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19032.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act and Section 159.5, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel as well as a deputy chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. All such personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and the direction of the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 30.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19033.

Except as qualified by this chapter the chief has all the powers and duties of a head of a department under Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19034.

With the approval of the director, the chief may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this chapter and declaring the policy of the bureau, and shall determine when any article, not otherwise clearly defined, is “upholstered furniture” or “bedding” or “insulation” under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 925, Sec. 8.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

19034.5.

All rules and regulations shall become effective not earlier than 30 days after approval by the director, and upon compliance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensing [19049. - 19064.]

19049.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in a business regulated by this chapter unless, at the time of so doing, he or she holds a valid, unexpired license to engage in that business, in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19050.

To obtain a license authorized by this chapter, an applicant shall submit to the chief an application in writing.

The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the chief and shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1310.)
-------------------------------------------

19051.

Every upholstered-furniture retailer, unless they hold an importer’s license, a furniture and bedding manufacturer’s license, a wholesale furniture and bedding dealer’s license, a custom upholsterer’s license, or a retail furniture and bedding dealer’s license shall hold a retail furniture dealer’s license.

(a) This section does not apply to a person whose sole business is designing and specifying for interior spaces, and who purchases specific amenable upholstered furniture items on behalf of a client, provided that the furniture is purchased from an appropriately licensed importer, wholesaler, or retailer. This section does not apply to a person who sells “used” and
 “antique” furniture as defined in Sections 19008.1 and 19008.2.

(b) This section does not apply to a person who is licensed as a home medical device retail facility by the State Department of Public Health, provided that the furniture is purchased from an appropriately licensed importer, wholesaler, or retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 18.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19052.

Every custom upholsterer, unless he or she holds a furniture and bedding manufacturer’s license, shall hold a custom upholsterer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19053.

Every upholstered-furniture wholesaler, bedding wholesaler, and upholstered-furniture and bedding wholesaler, unless he or she holds an importer’s license, shall hold a wholesale furniture and bedding dealer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19053.1.

Every importer shall hold an importer’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19054.

Every upholstered-furniture manufacturer, bedding manufacturer, upholstered-furniture and bedding manufacturer, or bedding renovator, unless he or she holds an importer’s license, shall hold a furniture and bedding manufacturer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19055.

Every bedding retailer, unless they hold an importer’s license, an upholstered-furniture and bedding manufacturer’s license, a wholesale upholstered-furniture and bedding dealer’s license, or a retail furniture and bedding dealer’s license, shall hold a retail bedding dealer’s license.

(a) This section does not apply to a person whose sole business is designing and specifying for interior spaces, and who purchases specific amenable bedding items on behalf of a client, provided that the bedding is purchased from an appropriately licensed
 importer, wholesaler, or retailer.

(b) This section does not apply to a person who is licensed as a home medical device retail facility by the State Department of Public Health, provided that the bedding is purchased from an appropriately licensed importer, wholesaler, or retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 19.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19056.

Every bedding renovator shall hold an upholstered-furniture and bedding manufacturer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19059.

Every supply dealer, unless he or she holds an upholstered-furniture and bedding manufacturer’s license or an importer’s license, shall hold a supply dealer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19059.5.

Every sanitizer shall hold a sanitizer’s license unless they are licensed as a home medical device retail facility by the State Department of Public Health or as an upholstered furniture and bedding manufacturer, retail furniture and bedding dealer, retail bedding dealer, or custom upholsterer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 20.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19059.7.

Every insulation manufacturer who sells insulation material in California shall hold an insulation manufacturing license issued by the bureau. Manufacturers having more than one manufacturing plant shall hold a single license for all plants under the same ownership producing the same generic type of insulation. The total annual license fee for any insulation manufacturer shall not exceed eight thousand dollars ($8,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 925, Sec. 9.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

19060.

Every person in any class shall obtain a separate license for each branch house; but one whose manufacturing plant is located in another state or foreign country, and who is licensed to manufacture upholstered furniture or bedding or filling materials for sale in California, may have one wholesale outlet operated in the same name in California, covered by the license issued to the factory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19060.5.

Every person who, on his or her own account, sells either directly or indirectly to any person either at wholesale or retail any merchandise subject to this chapter by means of a car, catalog, office, or in any other manner, shall obtain the proper license for each method of sale or distribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19060.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every person who, on his or her own account, advertises, solicits or contracts to manufacture, repair or renovate upholstered furniture or bedding, and who either does the work himself or herself or has others do it for him or her, shall obtain the particular license required by this chapter for the particular type of work that he or she solicits or advertises that he or she will do, regardless of whether he or she has a shop or factory.

(b) Every person who, on his or her own account, advertises, solicits or contracts to repair or renovate upholstered furniture and who does not do the work himself or herself nor have employees do it for him or her but does have the work done by a licensed custom upholsterer need not obtain a license as a custom upholsterer but shall obtain a license as a retail furniture dealer. However, nothing in this section shall exempt a retail furniture dealer from complying with Sections 19162 and 19163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19061.

Every person doing business at the same address under more than one firm name is subject to the license provisions for each firm name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

19061.5.

The chief shall prescribe the procedure relative to:

(a) Assignment or reassignment of serial or registry numbers.

(b) Transfer of licenses between persons, where such transfer is effected through rent, lease or sale of the business.

(c) Change in name, ownership, address, or of license classification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19062.

A license issued by the bureau shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the main office or principal place of business of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19063.

The bureau may refuse to issue any license provided for in this chapter to any individual:

(a) Who has had any license issued to them revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew their license while it was under suspension.

(b) If any license of a partnership or limited liability company of which they are or were a member, or of a corporation of which they are or were an officer or director, or of a firm or association of which they are or were an officer or of which they are or were acting in a managerial capacity, has had any license issued to it revoked or suspended,
 and while acting as a member, officer, director, or in a managerial capacity they participated in any of the prohibited acts for which the license was revoked or suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 33.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19064.

The bureau may refuse to issue any license provided for in this chapter to any partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association:

(a) Who has had any license issued to it revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew its license while it was under suspension.

(b) If any member of the partnership, or any officer or director of the corporation, or any officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of the firm or association has had any license issued to
 them revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew their license while it was under suspension.

(c) If any member of the limited liability company or of the partnership, or any officer or director of the corporation, or any officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of the firm or association, was either a member of any limited liability company or of any partnership, or an officer or director of any corporation, or an officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of any firm or association, whose license has been revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who failed to renew a license while it was under suspension, and while acting as a member, officer, director, or person acting in a managerial capacity participated in any of the prohibited acts for which any license was
 revoked or suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 34.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Application of the Chapter [19070. - 19074.]

19070.

This chapter applies to upholstered furniture, bedding and filling materials, and insulation sold in California regardless of its point of origin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

19071.

Secondhand bedding, or secondhand filling materials to be used or that could be used in bedding received from outside of this state shall comply with all the sanitization provisions of this chapter before it is accepted, sold or delivered, either directly or indirectly by any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19072.

Responsibility for compliance with this chapter rests not only with the manufacturer but also with the importer, wholesaler, retailer, or any person having in his or her possession any article of upholstered furniture or bedding, or filling materials with intent to resell contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19072.5.

Importers, wholesalers, and retailers shall not sell or resell in California unlabeled upholstered furniture or bedding. Importers, wholesalers, and retailers shall obtain labels from the manufacturer of those articles and shall affix the labels before offering any upholstered furniture or bedding for sale. This does not include furniture used exclusively for the purpose of physical fitness and exercise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19072.6.

The manufacturer of chairs and benches and similar articles, using slip seats that are manufactured by himself or herself or purchased from another, is responsible for the labeling of those articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19072.7.

Aiding, abetting, or knowingly combining or conspiring with an unlicensed person engaged in a business regulated by this chapter, to evade the provisions of this chapter, or allowing one’s license or registry number to be used by an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this chapter is grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19073.

This chapter does not apply to upholstered furniture, bedding, or insulation manufactured and sold at wholesale in California for delivery outside the borders of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

19074.

This chapter does not apply to the manufacturer of insulating window or door glass or products containing insulating window or door glass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 925, Sec. 10.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Labeling [19080. - 19094.]

19080.

A person shall not, at wholesale, retail, or otherwise, directly or indirectly, make, rebuild, repair, renovate, process, prepare, sell, offer for sale, display, or deliver any article of upholstered furniture or bedding, or any filling materials in prefabricated form or loose in bags or containers, unless the article or material is plainly and indelibly labeled. This does not include furniture used exclusively for the purpose of physical fitness and exercise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 401, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19081.

The form and size of labels, the fabric of which they are made and the wording and statements thereon necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, shall be approved by the chief.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19082.

A rubber stamp may be used in lieu of a label, on articles with slip seats having a smooth backing on which the imprint can be legibly and indelibly stamped.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19083.

Labels shall be securely attached to the article or filling material at the factory, in a position where they can be conveniently examined.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19084.

The information required by this chapter shall be printed on one side of the label only.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19085.

Labels shall contain no advertising matter nor anything that detracts, or is likely to detract from the required statements.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19086.

No mark, tag, sticker or any other device shall be placed upon labels by any dealer or any other person in such a way as to cover the required statements.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19087.

It is unlawful for any person, except the purchaser for his own use, to attempt to, or to remove, deface, alter or cause to be removed, defaced or altered, the label or any mark or statement thereon, placed upon any article of upholstered furniture, bedding, or filling material under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1507.)
-------------------------------------------

19088.

It is unlawful to use, in the description of filling material, or in the statement on any label, any misleading term or designation or any term or designation likely to mislead.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19089.

The bureau may establish grades, specifications and tolerances for the kinds and qualities of materials which are used or intended to be used in the manufacture, repair or renovation of upholstered furniture, bedding or filling materials, and may approve or adopt designations and rules which are not in conflict with any provisions of this chapter, for the labeling of articles filled with these materials.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19089.3.

All bedding with liquid filling material and each component part of such bedding shall be clearly labeled in a manner approved by the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19089.5.

Any upholstered furniture or mattress that is made from or contains nonflame retardant cellular foam shall be labeled in a manner approved by the chief. On and after January 1, 2004, all bedding that is made from or contains nonflame retardant cellular foam shall also be labeled in a manner approved by the chief. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, no label is required for a product that complies with the regulations required by Section 19161 or with applicable federal flammability regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19092.

The repairer or renovator of any secondhand upholstered furniture or bedding which is subsequently sold, shall affix the “Secondhand Material” label.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

19093.

Any person who repairs or renovates upholstered furniture or bedding for the owner for his or her own or a tenant’s use, shall affix the “Owner’s Material” label, which shall be attached to the article before delivery to the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19094.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Component” means the separate constituent parts of upholstered furniture sold in California, as identified in Technical Bulletin 117-2013, specifically cover fabrics, barrier materials, resilient filling materials, and decking materials.

(2) “Covered products” means any flexible polyurethane foam or upholstered or reupholstered furniture sold in California that is required to meet the test requirements set forth in Technical Bulletin 117-2013, entitled “Requirements, Test Procedure and Apparatus for Testing the Smolder Resistance of Materials
 Used in Upholstered Furniture.”

(3) “Flame-retardant chemical” means any chemical or chemical compound for which a functional use is to resist or inhibit the spread of fire. Flame-retardant chemicals include, but are not limited to, halogenated, phosphorous-based, nitrogen-based, and nanoscale flame retardants, flame-retardant chemicals listed as “designated chemicals” pursuant to Section 105440 of the Health and Safety Code, and any chemical or chemical compound for which “flame retardant” appears on the substance Safety Data Sheet (SDS) pursuant to Section 1910.1200(g) of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Chemical” means either of the following:

(A) An organic or inorganic substance of a
 particular molecular identity, including any combination of those substances occurring, in whole or in part, as a result of a chemical reaction or occurring in nature, and any element, ion, or uncombined radical, and any degradate, metabolite, or reaction product of a substance with a particular molecular identity.

(B) A chemical ingredient, which means a substance comprising one or more substances described in subparagraph (A).

(5) “Molecular identity” means the substance’s properties listed below:

(A) Agglomeration state.

(B) Bulk density.

(C) Chemical composition, including surface
 coating.

(D) Crystal structure.

(E) Dispersibility.

(F) Molecular structure.

(G) Particle density.

(H) Particle size, size distribution, and surface area.

(I) Physical form and shape, at room temperature and pressure.

(J) Physicochemical properties.

(K) Porosity.

(L) Solubility in water and biologically relevant fluids.

(M) Surface charge.

(N) Surface reactivity.

(6) “Added flame-retardant chemicals” means flame-retardant
 chemicals that are present in any covered product or component thereof at levels above 1,000 parts per million.

(7) “Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(8) “Consumer Price Index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(b) (1) A manufacturer of covered products shall indicate whether or not the product contains added flame-retardant chemicals by including the following “flame-retardant chemical statement” on the label described in Section 1374.3 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations for covered products:
“The
 upholstery materials in this product:

_____contain added flame-retardant chemicals

_____contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals

The State of California has updated the flammability standard and determined that the fire safety requirements for this product can be met without adding flame-retardant chemicals. The state has identified many flame-retardant chemicals as being known to, or strongly suspected of, adversely impacting human health or development.”
A manufacturer of covered products shall indicate the absence or presence of added flame-retardant chemicals by placing an “X” in one of the appropriate blanks.

(2) This statement shall
 be included in the label described in Section 1374.3 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations in accordance with the bureau’s regulations for that label. The statement need not be in all capital letters, and shall follow the statement required by Section 1374.3 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) (1) The bureau shall ensure compliance with the labeling requirements in this section.

(2) (A) The bureau shall provide the Department of Toxic Substances Control with a selection of samples from covered products marked “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” for testing for the presence of added flame-retardant chemicals. The samples shall be from the components identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).
 The bureau shall select samples based on consultation with the department, taking into account a range of manufacturers and types of covered products. The bureau and the department shall consult on the tests to be conducted by the department. The department shall provide the results of any completed test to the bureau. The bureau shall reimburse the department for the cost of testing for the presence of added flame-retardant chemicals in covered products marked “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals.”

(B) No later than August 1 of each fiscal year, the bureau shall assess available resources and determine the number of tests to be conducted in the corresponding fiscal year, pursuant to this subparagraph.

(3) (A) If the department’s testing shows that
 a covered product labeled as “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” is mislabeled because it contains added flame-retardant chemicals, the bureau may assess fines for violations against manufacturers of the covered product and component manufacturers to be held jointly and severally liable for the violation.

(B) A fine for a violation of this subparagraph relating to mislabeling shall be assessed in accordance with the factors described in subdivision (d) and the following schedule:

(i) The fine for the first violation shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(ii) The fine for the second violation shall be not less than two thousand five
 hundred dollars ($2,500) but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(iii) The fine for the third violation shall be not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

(iv) The fine for any subsequent violation shall be not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(C) The fines in paragraph (B) shall replace any other fines in this article for a violation of the testing requirements of this section. This clause does not alter or amend any other penalty otherwise imposed by this article.

(D) If the department’s testing shows that a
 covered product labeled as “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” is mislabeled because it contains added flame-retardant chemicals, in addition to a fine or any other request, the bureau may request that the label required by subdivision (b) for covered products that belong to the same stock keeping unit (SKU) currently produced by the manufacturer be corrected to reflect that flame-retardant chemicals are added to the covered product.

(E) If the department’s testing shows that a covered product labeled as “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” is mislabeled because it contains added flame-retardant chemicals, in addition to a fine or any other request, the bureau may request additional testing of more products belonging to the same stock keeping unit (SKU) at the manufacturer’s expense to verify the accuracy of the
 label required by subdivision (b) for covered products if the manufacturer wishes to retain the “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” designation on the label required by subdivision (b).

(d) (1) The bureau shall make information about any citation issued pursuant to this section available to the public on its internet website.

(2) In determining the amount of the fine for violations of this section, the bureau shall consider the following factors:

(A) The nature and severity of the violation.

(B) The good or bad faith of the cited person.

(C) The history of previous
 violations.

(D) Evidence that the violation was willful.

(E) The extent to which the cited person or entity has cooperated with the bureau.

(3) (A) The bureau shall adjust all minimum and maximum fines imposed by this section for inflation every five years.

(B) The adjustment shall be equivalent to the percentage, if any, that the Consumer Price Index at the time of adjustment exceeds the Consumer Price Index at the time this section goes into effect. Any increase determined under this paragraph shall be rounded as follows:

(i) In multiples of ten dollars ($10) in the case of
 penalties less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100).

(ii) In multiples of one hundred dollars ($100) in the case of penalties greater than one hundred dollars ($100) but less than or equal to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
